Illinois, session 104th, HB1310.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 4-109 and 4-109.1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/4-109)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-109)7    Sec. 4-109. Pension. 8    (a) A firefighter age 50 or more with 20 or more years of 9creditable service, who is no longer in service as a 10firefighter, shall receive a monthly pension of 1/2 the 11monthly salary attached to the rank held by him or her in the 12fire service at the date of retirement.13    The monthly pension shall be increased by 1/12 of 2.5% of 14such monthly salary for each additional month over 20 years of 15service through 30 years of service, to a maximum of 75% of 16such monthly salary.17    The changes made to this subsection (a) by this amendatory 18Act of the 91st General Assembly apply to all pensions that 19become payable under this subsection on or after January 1, 201999. All pensions payable under this subsection that began on 21or after January 1, 1999 and before the effective date of this 22amendatory Act shall be recalculated, and the amount of the 23increase accruing for that period shall be payable to the   HB1310- 2 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1pensioner in a lump sum.2    (b) A firefighter who retires or is separated from service 3having at least 10 but less than 20 years of creditable 4service, who is not entitled to receive a disability pension, 5and who did not apply for a refund of contributions at his or 6her last separation from service shall receive a monthly 7pension upon attainment of age 60 based on the monthly salary 8attached to his or her rank in the fire service on the date of 9retirement or separation from service according to the 10following schedule:11    For 10 years of service, 15% of salary; 12    For 11 years of service, 17.6% of salary; 13    For 12 years of service, 20.4% of salary; 14    For 13 years of service, 23.4% of salary; 15    For 14 years of service, 26.6% of salary; 16    For 15 years of service, 30% of salary; 17    For 16 years of service, 33.6% of salary; 18    For 17 years of service, 37.4% of salary; 19    For 18 years of service, 41.4% of salary; 20    For 19 years of service, 45.6% of salary.21    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 22the provisions of this subsection (c) apply to a person who 23first becomes a firefighter under this Article on or after 24January 1, 2011.25    A firefighter age 55 or more who has 10 or more years of 26service in that capacity shall be entitled at his option to   HB1310- 3 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1receive a monthly pension for his service as a firefighter 2computed by multiplying 2.5% for each year of such service by 3his or her final average salary.4    The pension of a firefighter who is retiring after 5attaining age 50 with 10 or more years but less than 20 years 6of creditable service shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 7each month that the firefighter's age is under age 55.8    The pension of a firefighter who is retiring after 9attaining age 50 with 20 or more years of creditable service 10shall not be reduced. 11    The maximum pension under this subsection (c) shall be 75% 12of final average salary.13    For the purposes of this subsection (c), "final average 14salary" means the greater of: (i) the average monthly salary 15obtained by dividing the total salary of the firefighter 16during the 48 consecutive months of service within the last 60 17months of service in which the total salary was the highest by 18the number of months of service in that period; or (ii) the 19average monthly salary obtained by dividing the total salary 20of the firefighter during the 96 consecutive months of service 21within the last 120 months of service in which the total salary 22was the highest by the number of months of service in that 23period. 24    Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under this 25Code (including without limitation the calculation of benefits 26and employee contributions), the annual salary based on the   HB1310- 4 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1plan year of a member or participant to whom this Section 2applies shall not exceed $106,800; however, that amount shall 3annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of 4that amount, including all previous adjustments, or (ii) the 5annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) 6in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 7September preceding each November 1, including all previous 8adjustments. 9    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 101st General 10Assembly shall cause or otherwise result in any retroactive 11adjustment of any employee contributions. 12(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.) 13    (40 ILCS 5/4-109.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-109.1)14    Sec. 4-109.1. Increase in pension. 15    (a) Except as provided in subsection (e), the monthly 16pension of a firefighter who retires after July 1, 1971 and 17prior to January 1, 1986, shall, upon either the first of the 18month following the first anniversary of the date of 19retirement if 60 years of age or over at retirement date, or 20upon the first day of the month following attainment of age 60 21if it occurs after the first anniversary of retirement, be 22increased by 2% of the originally granted monthly pension and 23by an additional 2% in each January thereafter. Effective 24January 1976, the rate of the annual increase shall be 3% of 25the originally granted monthly pension.   HB1310- 5 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1    (b) The monthly pension of a firefighter who retired from 2service with 20 or more years of service, on or before July 1, 31971, shall be increased, in January of the year following the 4year of attaining age 65 or in January 1972, if then over age 565, by 2% of the originally granted monthly pension, for each 6year the firefighter received pension payments. In each 7January thereafter, he or she shall receive an additional 8increase of 2% of the original monthly pension. Effective 9January 1976, the rate of the annual increase shall be 3%. 10    (c) The monthly pension of a firefighter who is receiving 11a disability pension under this Article shall be increased, in 12January of the year following the year the firefighter attains 13age 60, or in January 1974, if then over age 60, by 2% of the 14originally granted monthly pension for each year he or she 15received pension payments. In each January thereafter, the 16firefighter shall receive an additional increase of 2% of the 17original monthly pension. Effective January 1976, the rate of 18the annual increase shall be 3%. 19    (c-1) On January 1, 1998, every child's disability benefit 20payable on that date under Section 4-110 or 4-110.1 shall be 21increased by an amount equal to 1/12 of 3% of the amount of the 22benefit, multiplied by the number of months for which the 23benefit has been payable. On each January 1 thereafter, every 24child's disability benefit payable under Section 4-110 or 254-110.1 shall be increased by 3% of the amount of the benefit 26then being paid, including any previous increases received   HB1310- 6 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1under this Article. These increases are not subject to any 2limitation on the maximum benefit amount included in Section 34-110 or 4-110.1. 4    (c-2) On July 1, 2004, every pension payable to or on 5behalf of a minor or disabled surviving child that is payable 6on that date under Section 4-114 shall be increased by an 7amount equal to 1/12 of 3% of the amount of the pension, 8multiplied by the number of months for which the benefit has 9been payable. On July 1, 2005, July 1, 2006, July 1, 2007, and 10July 1, 2008, every pension payable to or on behalf of a minor 11or disabled surviving child that is payable under Section 124-114 shall be increased by 3% of the amount of the pension 13then being paid, including any previous increases received 14under this Article. These increases are not subject to any 15limitation on the maximum benefit amount included in Section 164-114. 17    (d) The monthly pension of a firefighter who retires after 18January 1, 1986, shall, upon either the first of the month 19following the first anniversary of the date of retirement if 2055 years of age or over, or upon the first day of the month 21following attainment of age 55 if it occurs after the first 22anniversary of retirement, be increased by 1/12 of 3% of the 23originally granted monthly pension for each full month that 24has elapsed since the pension began, and by an additional 3% in 25each January thereafter. 26    The changes made to this subsection (d) by this amendatory   HB1310- 7 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1Act of the 91st General Assembly apply to all initial 2increases that become payable under this subsection on or 3after January 1, 1999. All initial increases that became 4payable under this subsection on or after January 1, 1999 and 5before the effective date of this amendatory Act shall be 6recalculated and the additional amount accruing for that 7period, if any, shall be payable to the pensioner in a lump 8sum. 9    (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), upon 10the first day of the month following (1) the first anniversary 11of the date of retirement, or (2) the attainment of age 55, or 12(3) July 1, 1987, whichever occurs latest, the monthly pension 13of a firefighter who retired on or after January 1, 1977 and on 14or before January 1, 1986 and did not receive an increase under 15subsection (a) before July 1, 1987, shall be increased by 3% of 16the originally granted monthly pension for each full year that 17has elapsed since the pension began, and by an additional 3% in 18each January thereafter. The increases provided under this 19subsection are in lieu of the increases provided in subsection 20(a). 21    (f) In July 2009, the monthly pension of a firefighter who 22retired before July 1, 1977 shall be recalculated and 23increased to reflect the amount that the firefighter would 24have received in July 2009 had the firefighter been receiving 25a 3% compounded increase for each year he or she received 26pension payments after January 1, 1986, plus any increases in   HB1310- 8 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1pension received for each year prior to January 1, 1986. In 2each January thereafter, he or she shall receive an additional 3increase of 3% of the amount of the pension then being paid. 4The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 596th General Assembly apply without regard to whether the 6firefighter was in service on or after its effective date. 7    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 8the monthly pension of a person who first becomes a 9firefighter under this Article on or after January 1, 2011 10shall be increased on the January 1 occurring either on or 11after the attainment of age 55 60 or the first anniversary of 12the pension start date, whichever is later. Each annual 13increase shall be calculated at 3% or one-half the annual 14unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the 15consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 16September preceding each November 1, whichever is less, of the 17originally granted pension. If the annual unadjusted 18percentage change in the consumer price index-u for a 12-month 19period ending in September is zero or, when compared with the 20preceding period, decreases, then the pension shall not be 21increased. 22    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "consumer price 23index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 24Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 25measures the average change in prices of goods and services 26purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average,   HB1310- 9 -LRB104 07508 RPS 17552 b1all items, 1982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each 2annual adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension 3Division of the Department of Insurance and made available to 4the boards of the pension funds. 5    Notwithstanding Section 1-103.1, the changes made by this 6amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply without 7regard to whether the person who first became a firefighter 8under this Article on or after January 1, 2011 is in active 9service under this Article on or after the effective date of 10this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 11(Source: P.A. 96-775, eff. 8-28-09; 96-1495, eff. 1-1-11.) 12    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 13Section 8.49 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)15    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 168 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 17the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 18Act of the 104th General Assembly. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.